Arkansas, session 2025, HB1806.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-16-103 is amended to read as follows:
6-16-103. Course of study generally — Online portal required —
Definitions.
(a) There shall be taught in all of the public or elementary schools
of in this state subjects that may be designated by the State Board of
Education or as required by law.
(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the
inclusion of additional subjects in the state course of study or in any
*TNL229*
04-09-2025 10:26:45 TNL229

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 HB1806
course formulated for a school district and approved by the state board.
(c)(1) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
establish and maintain a statewide, centralized, easily accessible online
portal for parents, school faculty, and school staff to access instructional
materials, if funding is available.
(2) The portal required by subdivision (c)(1) of this section
shall provide curriculum transparency that enables a parent to:
(A) Search and view instructional materials that are
searchable by district, school, and grade level;
(B) Review summaries of the content of each textbook used
by a district;
(C) Search and view the full content of each textbook used
by a district;
(D) Search and view library media materials used by each
school in a district; and
(E) Review a school's library media materials and opt out
his or her child from accessing library media materials the parent does not
wish to be available for his or her child.
(3) The portal required by subdivision (c)(1) of this section
shall enable a school administrator, school faculty member, and school staff
member to:
(A) Have uniform access to Arkansas school standards in a
single repository to ensure transparency and reduce ambiguity; and
(B) Reduce school employee workload by placing all
instructional materials in a centralized, searchable database.
(4) The portal required by subdivision (c)(1) of this section
shall enable a school administrator to comply with changing rules and
requirements by creating a database that contains school policies and
automatically updates based on changing rules and requirements.
(d) As used in this section:
(1) "District" means an Arkansas public kindergarten through
grade twelve (K-12) school district;
(2) "Instructional material" means a textbook, workbook, library
book, a library media material, a laboratory material, computer software,
video, or tape;
(3) "Library media material" means print and nonprint material
04-09-2025 10:26:45 TNL229

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 HB1806
that is collected, processed, and stored by a school library media center and
that is available for student use;
(4) "Parent" means a parent, legal guardian, or person standing
in loco parentis to a child; and
(5) "School" means a public kindergarten through grade twelve
(K-12) school within a district.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Implementation.
The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall provide the
portal required under § 6-16-103(c) no later than January 15, 2026, if
funding is available.

/s/Vaught























04-09-2025 10:26:45 TNL229